Hawaii statutes.
§180-11 Consolidating districts; petition.
Petitions for the consolidation of two or more districts may be filed with the
department of land and natural resources. The petitions must be signed by a
majority of the members of the governing body, or by twenty-five or more land
occupier votes in, each district proposed to be consolidated. In such event
the procedures herein provided for organizing districts shall be observed,
insofar as they are applicable; provided that the votes cast in the referendum
on the question of consolidation shall be counted separately for each district
and the department shall not have authority to determine in favor of the
proposed consolidation unless a majority of the votes cast with respect to each
separate district shall have been cast in favor thereof. The provisions of
sections 180-6 to 180-8 governing the selection of district governing bodies
and the completion of the organization of districts shall apply to the
selection of a governing body for and the completion of the organization of any
new district resulting from a consolidation of districts. The terms of office
of the directors of the consolidating districts shall expire and the terms of
office of the directors of the new consolidated district shall commence, upon
the issuance by the lieutenant governor of a certificate of the due
organization of the consolidated district. Upon such a consolidation, all the
property rights and liabilities of the several consolidating districts shall be
vested in and assumed by the consolidated district. [L 1947, c 191, pt of §5;
RL 1955, §28-14; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §§9, 22; am L 1961, c 132, §2; am L
1967, c 145, §§1, 2; HRS §180-11]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next